Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.270

Cost.

The cost of a local voters' pamphlet shall be considered an election cost to those local jurisdictions included in the pamphlet and shall be prorated in the manner provided in RCW 29A.04.410.

[ 2003 c 111 s 819. Prior: 1984 c 106 s 9. Formerly RCW 29.81A.070.]